Hawaii statutes.
§576B-611 Modification of child
support order of another state. (a) If section 576B-613 does not apply,
upon petition a tribunal of this State may modify a child support order issued
in another state that is registered in this State if, after notice and hearing,
the tribunal finds that:

(1) The following requirements are met:

(A) Neither the child, nor the obligee who is
an individual, nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

(B) A petitioner who is a nonresident of this
State seeks modification; and

(C) The respondent is subject to the personal
jurisdiction of the tribunal of this State; or

(2) This State is the residence of the child, or a
party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the
tribunal of this State, and all of the parties who are individuals have filed
consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of this State to
modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

(b) Modification of a registered child support
order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply
to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this State and the
order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

(c) A tribunal of this State may not modify
any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of
the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If two
or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and
same child, the order that controls and shall be recognized under section 576B‑207
establishes the aspects of the support order that are nonmodifiable.

(d) In a proceeding to modify a child support
order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial
controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The
obligor's fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order shall
preclude imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of this
State.

(e) On the issuance of an order by a tribunal
of this State modifying a child support order issued in another state, the
tribunal of this State becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive
jurisdiction.

(f) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through
(e) and section 576B-201(b), a tribunal of this State retains jurisdiction to
modify an order issued by a tribunal of this State if:

(1) One party resides in another state; and

(2) The other party resides outside the United
States. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next